Utah statutes.
31A-43-201.   Scope of chapter.

(1)  This chapter establishes criteria for the issuance of stop-loss insurance contracts or re-insurance contracts for small employers that establish self-funded or partially self-funded health plans for the small employer's employees.  This chapter does not:

(a)  impose any requirement or duty on any person other than a stop-loss insurer or re-insurer who issues a stop-loss insurance contract to a small employer;

(b)  treat any stop-loss insurance contract as a direct policy of health insurance; or

(c)  constitute an attempt to exercise authority over self-funded or partially self-funded health benefit plans sponsored by a small employer.

(2)  This chapter applies to a small employer stop-loss contract issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2013.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

